North Dakota statutes. TITLE 6 Banks and Banking
CHAPTER 6-09 The Bank of North Dakota
6-09-46.2.
Rebuilders loan program — Rebuilders permanent loan fund — Continuing appropriation.

The Bank of North Dakota shall develop a rebuilders loan program to make or participate in loans to North Dakota residents affected by extraordinary losses as a result of a presidentially declared disaster or governor-declared disaster or emergency in the state. Under the rebuilders loan program the Bank shall develop and implement specific loan programs to respond to the specific needs resulting from a disaster or emergency. The Bank may fund the loan from any available funding in the rebuilders permanent loan fund and may accept private sector donations and funds from the federal government.

Upon request of the Bank of North Dakota, the governor shall furnish the Bank with information relating to the nature and amount of state and local resources that have been or will be committed to alleviating the results of the disaster or emergency, an estimate of the amount and severity of the damage and the impact on the private and public sectors, and an estimate of the type and amount of assistance needed.

To apply for a loan under the program, a person shall apply to the originating financial institution. Upon Bank of North Dakota approval of an application, the Bank shall make a loan in accordance with the loan program established under this section. The Bank shall establish a loan application period, which may not exceed a period of eighteen months from the date of the declaration of the disaster or emergency.

Excluding the rebuilders and rebuilders home loans transferred to the fund, the Bank of North Dakota shall deposit in the fund all principal and interest paid on the loans made from the fund. The Bank may deduct from interest payments received on a loan under the program a service fee for administering the fund for the Bank and the originating financial institution. The Bank shall contract with a certified public accounting firm to audit the fund as necessary. The cost of the audit, and any other actual costs incurred by the Bank on behalf of the fund, must be paid by the fund.

There is created in the state treasury the rebuilders permanent loan fund administered by the Bank of North Dakota. The fund consists of all moneys transferred to the fund by the legislative assembly, interest on moneys in the fund, and payments to the fund of principal and interest on loans made from the fund. All moneys in the fund are appropriated to the Bank on a continuing basis for the rebuilders loan program.

If approved by the industrial commission, the fund may borrow from the Bank of North Dakota to provide funding for loans under this section. A loan made to the fund by the Bank must be repaid with principal and interest payment received by the rebuilders permanent loan fund or with moneys appropriated by the legislative assembly.

The Bank of North Dakota shall adopt policies to implement this section.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

6-09-47.
Medical facility infrastructure loan fund — Continuing appropriation — Audit and costs of administration.

The Bank of North Dakota shall administer a loan program to provide loans to medical facilities to conduct construction that improves the health care infrastructure in the state or improves access to existing nonprofit health care providers in the state. The construction project may include land purchases and may include purchase, lease, erection, or improvement of any structure or facility to the extent the governing board of the health care facility has the authority to authorize such activity.

In order to be eligible under this loan program, the applicant must be the governing board of the health care facility which shall submit an application to the Bank. The application must:

Detail the proposed construction project, which must be a project of at least one million dollars and which is expected to be utilized for at least thirty years;

Demonstrate the need and long-term viability of the construction project; and

Include financial information as the Bank may determine appropriate to determine eligibility, such as whether there are alternative financing methods.

A loan provided under this section:

May not exceed the lesser of fifteen million dollars or seventy-five percent of the actual cost of the project;

Must have an interest rate equal to one percent; and

Must provide a repayment schedule of no longer than twenty-five years.

A recipient of a loan under this section shall complete the financed construction project within twenty-four months of approval of the loan. Failure to comply with this subsection may result in forfeiture of the entire loan received under this section.

The medical facility infrastructure fund is a special fund in the state treasury. This fund is a revolving fund. All moneys transferred into the medical facility infrastructure fund, interest on moneys in the fund, and collections of principal and interest on loans from the fund are appropriated to the Bank on a continuing basis for the purpose of providing loans under this section.

Funds in the medical facility infrastructure fund may be used for loans as provided under this section and to pay the costs of administration of the fund. Annually, the Bank may deduct a service fee for administering the medical facility infrastructure fund maintained under this section.

The medical facility infrastructure fund must be audited in accordance with section 6-09-29. The cost of the audit and any other actual costs incurred by the Bank on behalf of the fund must be paid from the fund.

The Bank shall deposit loan repayment funds in the medical facility infrastructure fund.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 84, § 1; 2015, ch. 46, § 10, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 84, § 1, effective March 22, 2019.

6-09-48.
Funds received in relation to federal student loan program — Administration — Continuing appropriation.

The Bank of North Dakota shall administer and manage the funds received in relation to the federal student loan program under section 2212 of the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 [Pub. L. 111-152].

The funds must be used to support the functions of the Bank related to the educational mission of the Bank.

The funds received by the Bank under subsection 1 are appropriated on a continuing basis to be used as provided in this section.

These funds are not subject to section 54-44.1-11.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 85, § 1; 2019, ch. 82, § 2, effective March 21, 2019.

6-09-49.
Infrastructure revolving loan fund — Continuing appropriation.

The infrastructure revolving loan fund is a special fund in the state treasury from which the Bank of North Dakota shall provide loans to political subdivisions, the Garrison Diversion Conservancy District, and the Lake Agassiz water authority for essential infrastructure projects. The Bank shall administer the infrastructure revolving loan fund. The maximum term of a loan made under this section is the lesser of thirty years or the useful life of the project. A loan made from the fund under this section must have an interest rate that does not exceed two percent per year.

For purposes of this section, “essential infrastructure projects” means capital construction projects to construct new infrastructure or replace existing infrastructure, which provide the fixed installations necessary for the function of a political subdivision. Capital construction projects exclude routine maintenance and repair projects, but include the following:

The Red River valley water supply project;

Water treatment plants;

Wastewater treatment plants;

Sewerlines and waterlines, including lift stations and pumping systems;

Storm water infrastructure, including curb and gutter construction;

Water storage systems, including dams, water tanks, and water towers;

Road and bridge infrastructure, including paved and unpaved roads and bridges;

Airport infrastructure;

Electricity transmission infrastructure;

Natural gas transmission infrastructure;

Communications infrastructure;

Emergency services facilities, excluding hospitals; and

Critical political subdivision buildings and infrastructure.

In processing political subdivision loan applications under this section, the Bank shall calculate the maximum outstanding loan amount per qualified applicant. A qualified applicant under this section may have a maximum combined total of forty million dollars in outstanding loans under this section and section 6-09-49.1. The Bank shall consider the applicant’s ability to repay the loan when processing the application and shall issue loans only to applicants that provide reasonable assurance of sufficient future income to repay the loan.

The Bank shall deposit in the infrastructure revolving loan fund all payments of interest and principal paid under loans made from the infrastructure revolving loan fund. The Bank may use a portion of the interest paid on the outstanding loans as a servicing fee to pay for administrative costs which may not exceed one-half of one percent of the amount of the interest payment. All moneys transferred to the fund, interest upon moneys in the fund, and payments to the fund of principal and interest are appropriated to the Bank on a continuing basis for administrative costs and for loan disbursement according to this section.

The Bank may adopt policies and establish guidelines to administer this loan program in accordance with the provisions of this section and to supplement and leverage the funds in the infrastructure revolving loan fund. Additionally, the Bank may adopt policies allowing participation by local financial institutions.

If a political subdivision applies for a loan under this section for a county road or bridge project, the department of transportation shall review and approve the project before the Bank may issue a loan. If a political subdivision applies for a loan under this section for a water-related project, the state water commission shall review and approve the project before the Bank may issue a loan. The department of transportation and state water commission may develop policies for reviewing and approving projects under this section.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 77, § 1, effective March 22, 2017; 2019, ch. 40, § 17, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 42, §§ 16, 17, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 80, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 06-09-49 was amended 3 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 80, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1431; Section 16 of Chapter 42, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2014; and Section 17 of Chapter 42, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2014.

6-09-49.1.
Legacy infrastructure loan fund — Continuing appropriation.

The legacy infrastructure loan fund is a special fund in the state treasury from which the Bank of North Dakota shall provide loans to political subdivisions, the Garrison Diversion Conservancy District, and the Lake Agassiz water authority for eligible infrastructure projects as authorized in this section.

The Bank of North Dakota may adopt policies and establish guidelines to administer the legacy infrastructure loan fund in accordance with this section.

A loan made from the legacy infrastructure loan fund must have an interest rate that does not exceed two percent per year. The maximum term of a loan under this section is the lesser of thirty years or the useful life of the project.

The Bank of North Dakota shall transfer all payments of principal and interest paid on loans made from the legacy infrastructure loan fund to the legacy fund. The Bank may use a portion of the interest paid on the outstanding loans as a servicing fee to pay for administrative costs, which may not exceed one-half of one percent of the amount of the outstanding loans.

An applicant shall issue an evidence of indebtedness as authorized by law.

When processing political subdivision loan applications under this section, the Bank of North Dakota shall calculate the maximum outstanding loan amount per qualified applicant. The maximum outstanding loan amount for infrastructure projects under subsection 7 is forty million dollars. The Bank shall consider the ability of the applicant to repay the loan while processing the application and shall issue loans only to applicants that provide reasonable assurance of sufficient future income to repay the loan.

Eligible infrastructure projects under this subsection are capital projects to construct new infrastructure or to replace infrastructure and which provide the fixed installations necessary for the function of a political subdivision. Capital construction projects exclude routine maintenance and repair projects, but include:

Water treatment plants;

Wastewater treatment plants;

Sewerlines and waterlines, including lift stations and pumping stations;

Water storage systems, including dams, water tanks, and water towers;

Storm water infrastructure, including curb and gutter construction;

Road and bridge infrastructure, including paved and unpaved roads and bridges;

Airport infrastructure;

Electricity transmission infrastructure;

Natural gas transmission infrastructure;

Communications infrastructure;

Emergency services facilities, excluding hospitals;

Essential political subdivision building and infrastructure; and

The Red River valley water supply project.

The department of transportation shall approve county road and bridge projects for purposes of loans under this section and may adopt policies for the review and approval of projects under this section.

For purposes of loans under this subsection, the state water commission shall review and approve eligible projects to construct new water-related infrastructure or to replace existing water-related infrastructure which provide the fixed installations necessary for the function of a political subdivision. The state water commission may adopt policies for the review and approval of projects under this section. Capital construction projects exclude routine maintenance and repair projects, but include:

Flood control;

Conveyance projects;

Rural water supply;

Water supply; and

General water management.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 81, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

6-09-49.2.
Water infrastructure revolving loan fund — State water commission — Continuing appropriation.

There is created in the state treasury the water infrastructure revolving loan fund to provide loans for water supply, flood protection, or other water development and water management projects. The fund consists of moneys transferred into the fund, interest earned on moneys in the fund, and principal and interest payments to the fund. All moneys in the fund are appropriated to the Bank of North Dakota on a continuing basis for loan disbursements and administrative costs.

The state water commission shall approve eligible projects for loans from the water infrastructure loan fund. The state water commission shall consider the following when evaluating eligible projects:

A description of the nature and purposes of the proposed infrastructure project, including an explanation of the need for the project, the reasons why the project is in the public interest, and the overall economic impact of the project.

The estimated cost of the project, the amount of loan funding requested, and other proposed sources of funding.

The extent to which completion of the project will provide a benefit to the state or regions within the state.

Projects not eligible for the state revolving funds under chapters 61-28.1 and 61-28.2 must be given priority for loans from the water infrastructure revolving loan fund.

In consultation with the state water commission, the Bank of North Dakota shall develop policies for the review and approval of loans under this section. Loans made under this section must be made at the same interest rate as the revolving loan funds established under chapters 61-28.1 and 61-28.2.

The Bank of North Dakota shall manage and administer loans from the water infrastructure loan fund. The Bank shall deposit in the fund all principal and interest paid on loans made from the fund. Annually, the Bank may deduct one-half of one percent of the outstanding loan balance as a service fee for administering the water infrastructure revolving loan fund. The Bank shall contract with a certified public accounting firm to audit the fund. The cost of the audit must be paid from the fund.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 42, § 18, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 80, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 06-09-49.2 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 2 of Chapter 80, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1431; and Section 18 of Chapter 42, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2014.

6-09-50.
North Dakota financial center — Lease rates — Payments in lieu of taxes.

The North Dakota financial center is a building that is owned by the Bank of North Dakota and is adjacent to the building in which the Bank of North Dakota is housed. The Bank of North Dakota shall lease the space in the North Dakota financial center to other state agencies based on market rate lease prices. The Bank of North Dakota shall make payments in lieu of property taxes in the manner and according to the conditions and procedures that would apply if the building were privately owned.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 14, § 16.

6-09-51.
Dynamic fiscal impact analysis. [Expired]

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 364, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; expired by 2017, ch. 364, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.